Utah statutes.
35A-8-306.   Powers.

The impact board may:

(1)  appoint, where it considers this appropriate, a hearing examiner or administrative law judge with authority to conduct hearings, make determinations, and enter appropriate findings of facts, conclusions of law, and orders under authority of the impact board under Sections 11-13-306 and 11-13-307;

(2)  appoint additional professional and administrative staff necessary to effectuate Sections 11-13-306 and 11-13-307;

(3)  make independent studies regarding matters submitted to it under Sections 11-13-306 and 11-13-307 that the impact board, in its discretion, considers necessary, which studies shall be made a part of the record and may be considered in the impact board's determination; and

(4)  make rules under Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act it considers necessary to perform its responsibilities under Sections 11-13-306 and 11-13-307.

